src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
! vuozi:vuod+d%{uy%}, armas:armas+d%{uy%}
"d:t in partitive"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:t <=> [ d: | h | :t | (HarmDummy:) s ] (HarmDummy:) ( %^KS2S:0 ) %> _ ;
         [Vow | r | n ] _ (HarmDummy:) %> [ d: %{uy%}: | t y | t u ] ;
!!€# pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh
!!€0 pa0is%>ta0h

"s:z"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!! ```
s:z <=> _ (HarmDummy:) %^VOICE:0 ; !!= * @CODE@ pestä: pezen
!! ```

"k:g"
!! **@RULENAME@** pestä: peskäh
k:g <=> [ n | l |r ] (HarmDummy:) %> _ (%{ui%}:) %{aä%}: ;

"rd:rr weakening"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:r <=>
     Vow: r _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:) %> i) %^WGStem: [ (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
   Vow r (HarmDummy:) %> _ [ GRC | e %^WGStem: ] ; 
!!purra+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: purrah


"ld:ll weakening"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
d:l <=>
  Vow: l _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:) %> i) %^WGStem: [ (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
  Vow l (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ [ GRC | e %^WGStem: ] ;

"nd:nn weakening"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
d:n <=>
     Vow: n _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem: [(%^A2O:) %> i| (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
!     Vow: n _ Vow: (HarmDummy:) ((%^A2O:) %> i) %^WGStem: [ (%^E1:) %> | # ] ;
  Vow (HarmDummy:) ( %^WGStem:0 %> ) n %> _ [ GRC | e %^WGStem: ] ;
!! mennä+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: mennäh
!!€# kanda%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{aä%}s
!!€0 kanne00%>ttas


"rn:rr in prtprc"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{lnrs%}:r <=> r (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ (%{uy%}:) (%^WGStem:)  ;

"ln:ll in prtprc"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{lnrs%}:l <=> l (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ (%{uy%}:|%{aä%}:) (%^WGStem:)  ;
!!€ tul%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h
!!€ tul%>luh
!! ezitellä+V+Inf: **present/esitellä**
!!€ ezittel%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem
!!€ ezi0tel00%>lä0

"sn:ss in prtprc"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{lnrs%}:s <=> s (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ (%{uy%}:) (%^WGStem:)  ;

"%{dtlnr%}:d"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%{dtlnr%}:d <=> Vow: (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

"%{dtlnr%}:t"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%{dtlnr%}:t <=> s (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

"%{dtlnr%}:l"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%{dtlnr%}:l <=> l (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 
!! tulla+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: tullah
!!€ tul%{back%}%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}
!!€ tul0%>la
!! kuvitella+V+Inf
!!€ kuvittel%{back%}%^WGStem%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}
!!€ kuvi0tel00%>la

"%{dtlnr%}:n"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%{dtlnr%}:n <=> n (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

"%{dtlnr%}:r"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%{dtlnr%}:r <=> r (HarmDummy:) (%^WGStem:) %> _ ; 

!! ### CONSONANT LOSS
 
"čToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
!! ```
č:0 <=> _ č [ ((HarmDummy:) %>) Vow | Vow: (HarmDummy:) %> i ] %^WGStem:0 ; !! * @CODE@ suvaija:suvaičen
 _ č Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ; 
!! ```

"kToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**  aika: ajan
!! ```
k:0 <=> _ s (HarmDummy:) %^KS2S:0 ;
        _ k [ Vow (HarmDummy:) | Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^A2O: %> i | e h (HarmDummy:) ] %^WGStem:0 ;
!!€ lʼykkä%{front%}%^WGStem%>t%{AÄ%}
!!€ lʼy0kä00%>tä
!!€ abuniekka%{back%}%^A2O%>i%>l
!!€ abunie0ko00%>i%>l
!!€ liikkeh%{front%}%^WGStem
!!€ lii0keh00

!! ```

"gToZero"
!! **@RULENAME@**  aika: ajan
g:0 <=>
        [ Vow: - [ o | u ] ] _ i s (HarmDummy:) %> d: [ %{aä%}: %^WGStem: | i h ] ;
        [ Vow - [ o | u ] ] _ (HarmDummy:) e: (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 %> ;
!!€ väge%{front%}%^WGStem>n
!!€ vä0i00%>n
        [ Vow: - [ o | u ] ] _ i Cns:+ (HarmDummy:) %^Pen: %^WGStem: ;
!!€ pagis%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}h
!!€ pa0is000%>tah



!2013-04-29! tToZero in weak
"tToZero in weak geminate"
 t:0 <=>
  _ t [ %{uy%}: | u | y | %{aäuyiØ%}: |Vow: ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
 Vow: _ t [ Vow: (%> i)| e h | Vow: Cns: ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
!! ezitellä+V+Inf: **present/esitellä**
!!€ ezittel%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem
!!€ ezi0tel00%>lä0
! [ # Cns* Vow | # Cns* Vow [ Vow - [ i | u | y ] ] | Vow h [ y | u ] ] _  GRC ;
!2013-04-29!        [ #: Cns*  Vow+ [ h | (r) t ] | Vow ( %^WGStem:0 %> ) t | Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ ( n ) t | Vow t ] _  [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;
!2013-04-29!        t _ Vow l %^WGStem:0 ; ! ottel- to otel-
!!€# tavoitteh%^WGStem
!!€0 tavoi0teh0

"tTol in weak infinite form"
t:l <=> l (HarmDummy:) %> _ (%{aä%}:|a|ä) %^WGStem: ;
!!€ kuul%>t%{aä%}%^WGStem
!!€ kuul%>la0

! luba : luvan
"b:v"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
b:v <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vow ( r | l | Vow ) _ (HarmDummy:) Vow (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ;
        [ #: ] Cns* Vow ( r | l | Vow ) _  [ Vow: (HarmDummy:) %^Pen: %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;
! [ #: ] Cns* Vow ( r | l | Vow ) _  [ GRC | %^TS:0 i (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;
!r u b:v e {back}:0 ^WGStem:0 > t a

"b:m"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
!! ```
b:m <=> m _  [ a | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ; !!≈ @CODE@
!! ```

!2013-04-29!"double pp to p"
!2013-04-29!p:0 <=> [ #: Cns* Vow ( m ) p | #: Cns* Vow Vow p | Cns* Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ p ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WGStem:0 %> ] ;
"p:0 in lapsi"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
p:0 <=> Vow _ s  (HarmDummy:) %^KS2S:0  ;
 Vow: _ p Vow: (HarmDummy:) (%^RmVow:) (%> i) %^WGStem:0  ;
!!€ kuoppa%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow%>i%>l
!!€ kuo0p0000%>i%>l

!2013-04-29! Vowel raising
!2013-04-29!"o:u ö:y in Inf"
!2013-04-29! Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx: %> v v %{aä%}: %^RVow:0 ;
!2013-04-29!           Vx: _ %> v v %{aä%}: %^RVow:0 ;
!2013-04-29!          where Vx in (o ö)
!2013-04-29!                Vy in (u y) matched ;

!! ## Consonant loss
"d:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**   pidiä:piän
 d:0 <=>  # Cns* [ i | a: | o | ä ] _ [ ä: | a: | e: | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
!!€# pidä%^WGStem%>n
!!€0 pi0ä0%>n

"s:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**   
 s:0 <=>  [ u | u a | e ] _ s [ ä: | a: ( (HarmDummy:) %^A2O: %> i) | e: | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0  ;
!!€# bussa%^WGStem%>l
!!€0 bu0sa0%>l


!"Disallow V3 after two consecutive realized vowels"
! V3: /<= :Vow :0* :Vow :0* _ ;

"Disallow a:u before a and %> i"
a:u /<= _ a: %> i ;


!!TESTS
!echo 'A v r a a m {back}:0 > {aä}:a n' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'Avraam+N+Prop+Sg+Nom' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
